Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3546
Hospital district; dissolution; convert property to cash; disposition.

When a district is dissolved its board of directors shall convert all property of the district to cash and discharge all indebtedness of the district. All funds remaining after discharge of the district's indebtedness shall be deposited in the county treasuries of the counties in which the district is located in proportion to the population of the district located in each county, and credited to the general fund.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 18, p. 380;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.37.